test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-3tav-confl-cg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - pakkeet: # 1B
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Nom: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Gen: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Acc: pakkeet
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Ill: pakettân      
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Loc: pakettist
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Com: pakettáin
    pakkeet+N+Sg+Abe: pakkeettáá
    pakkeet+N+Ess:    pakettin
    pakkeet+N+Par:    pakettid
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Nom: paketteh
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Gen: pakettij
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Acc: pakettijd
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Ill: pakettáid
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Loc: pakettijn
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Com: pakettijguin
    pakkeet+N+Pl+Abe: pakettijttáá

  Noun - sukká: # 
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom: sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc: suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill: suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc: suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com: suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe: suháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess:    sukkán
    sukká+N+Par:   sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom: suháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen: suhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill: suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc: suháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com: suháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe: suháittáá

  Noun - päävir: # 2B
    päävir+N+Sg+Nom: päävir
    päävir+N+Sg+Gen: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Acc: pááppár
    päävir+N+Sg+Ill: pápárân
    päävir+N+Sg+Loc: pápárist
    päävir+N+Sg+Com: pápáráin
    päävir+N+Sg+Abe: pááppárttáá
    päävir+N+Ess: pävirin                   #pápárin
    päävir+N+Par:  pävirid                  #pápárid 
    päävir+N+Pl+Nom: pápáreh
    päävir+N+Pl+Gen: pápárij
    päävir+N+Pl+Acc: pápárijd
    päävir+N+Pl+Ill: pápáráid
    päävir+N+Pl+Loc: pápárijn
    päävir+N+Pl+Com: pápárijguin
    päävir+N+Pl+Abe: pápárijttáá

  Noun - koppâ: # 2B
    koppâ+N+Sg+Nom: koppâ
    koppâ+N+Sg+Gen: koopâ
    koppâ+N+Sg+Acc: koopâ
    koppâ+N+Sg+Ill: koopân
    koppâ+N+Sg+Loc: koopâst
    koppâ+N+Sg+Com: koppáin
    koppâ+N+Sg+Abe: kopâttáá
    koppâ+N+Ess:    koppân
    koppâ+N+Par:   koppâd
    koppâ+N+Pl+Nom: koopah
    koppâ+N+Pl+Gen: koopâi
    koppâ+N+Pl+Acc: koopâid
    koppâ+N+Pl+Ill: koppáid
    koppâ+N+Pl+Loc: koopâin
    koppâ+N+Pl+Com: kopâiguin
    koppâ+N+Pl+Abe: kopâittáá

  Noun - piivtâs: # 2B
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Nom: piivtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Gen: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Acc: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Ill: pihtâsân
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Loc: pihtâsist
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Com: pihtâsáin
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Abe: pihtâsttáá
    piivtâs+N+Ess:    pivtâsin
    piivtâs+N+Par:   pivtâsid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Nom: pihtâseh
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Gen: pihtâsij
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Acc: pihtâsijd
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Ill: pihtâsáid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Loc: pihtâsijn
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Com: pihtâsijguin
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Abe: pihtâsijttáá

  Noun - liähtu: # 2B
    liähtu+N+Sg+Nom: liähtu
    liähtu+N+Sg+Gen: liävtu
    liähtu+N+Sg+Acc: liävtu
    liähtu+N+Sg+Ill: liähtun
    liähtu+N+Sg+Loc: liävtust
    liähtu+N+Sg+Com: liävttoin
    liähtu+N+Sg+Abe: liävtuttáá
    liähtu+N+Ess:    liähtun
    liähtu+N+Par:   liähtud
    liähtu+N+Pl+Nom: liävtuh
    liähtu+N+Pl+Gen: liävtui
    liähtu+N+Pl+Acc: liävtuid
    liähtu+N+Pl+Ill: liävttoid
    liähtu+N+Pl+Loc: liävtuin
    liähtu+N+Pl+Com: liävtuiguin
    liähtu+N+Pl+Abe: liävtuittáá

  Noun - kiähtu: # 2B
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Nom: kiähtu
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Gen: kiähtu
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Acc: kiähtu
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Ill: kiähtun
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Loc: kiähtust
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Com: kiähtoin
    kiähtu+N+Sg+Abe: kiähtuttáá
    kiähtu+N+Ess:    kiähtun
    kiähtu+N+Par:   kiähtud
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Nom: kiähtuh
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Gen: kiähtui
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Acc: kiähtuid
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Ill: kiähtoid
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Loc: kiähtuin
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Com: kiähtuiguin
    kiähtu+N+Pl+Abe: kiähtuittáá

  Noun - tođhos: # 2A
    tođhos+N+Sg+Nom: tođhos
    tođhos+N+Sg+Gen: totkos
    tođhos+N+Sg+Acc: totkos
    tođhos+N+Sg+Ill: totkosân
    tođhos+N+Sg+Loc: totkosist
    tođhos+N+Sg+Com: totkosáin
    tođhos+N+Sg+Abe: totkosttáá
    tođhos+N+Ess:    tođhosin
    tođhos+N+Par:    tođhosid
    tođhos+N+Pl+Nom: totkoseh
    tođhos+N+Pl+Gen: totkosij
    tođhos+N+Pl+Acc: totkosijd
    tođhos+N+Pl+Ill: totkosáid
    tođhos+N+Pl+Loc: totkosijn
    tođhos+N+Pl+Com: totkosijguin
    tođhos+N+Pl+Abe: totkosijttáá



  Noun - hutkos: # 2A
    hutkos+N+Sg+Nom: hutkos
    hutkos+N+Sg+Gen: hutkos
    hutkos+N+Sg+Acc: hutkos
    hutkos+N+Sg+Ill: hutkosân
    hutkos+N+Sg+Loc: hutkosist
    hutkos+N+Sg+Com: hutkosáin
    hutkos+N+Sg+Abe: hutkosttáá
    hutkos+N+Ess:    hutkosin
    hutkos+N+Par:   hutkosid
    hutkos+N+Pl+Nom: hutkoseh
    hutkos+N+Pl+Gen: hutkosij
    hutkos+N+Pl+Acc: hutkosijd
    hutkos+N+Pl+Ill: hutkosáid
    hutkos+N+Pl+Loc: hutkosijn
    hutkos+N+Pl+Com: hutkosijguin
    hutkos+N+Pl+Abe: hutkosijttáá


  Noun - luččâ: # 2B
    luččâ+N+Sg+Nom: luččâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Gen: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Acc: luujâ
    luččâ+N+Sg+Ill: luučân
    luččâ+N+Sg+Loc: luujâst
    luččâ+N+Sg+Com: luujáin
    luččâ+N+Sg+Abe: lujâttáá
    luččâ+N+Ess:    luččân
    luččâ+N+Par:   luččâd
    luččâ+N+Pl+Nom: luujah
    luččâ+N+Pl+Gen: luujâi
    luččâ+N+Pl+Acc: luujâid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Ill: luujáid
    luččâ+N+Pl+Loc: luujâin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Com: lujâiguin
    luččâ+N+Pl+Abe: lujâittáá


  Noun - kurrâ: # 2B
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurrâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurân
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurâst
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Com: kuuráin
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Abe: kurâttáá
    kurrâ+N+Ess:    kurrân
    kurrâ+N+Par:   kurrâd
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurah
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Gen: kuurâi
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurâid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuuráid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurâin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Com: kurâiguin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Abe: kurâittáá


  Noun - šaarrân: # 1B
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Nom: šaarrân
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Gen: šaarrân
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Acc: šaarrân
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Ill: šarânân
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Loc: šarânist
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Com: šarânáin
    šaarrân+N+Sg+Abe: šaarrânttáá
    šaarrân+N+Ess:    šarânin
    šaarrân+N+Par:    šarânid
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Nom: šarâneh
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Gen: šarânij
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Acc: šarânijd
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Ill: šarânáid
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Loc: šarânijn
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Com: šarânijguin
    šaarrân+N+Pl+Abe: šarânijttáá


  Noun -  kales: # 2B
     kales+N+Sg+Nom:  kales
     kales+N+Sg+Gen: kallaas
     kales+N+Sg+Acc: kallaas
     kales+N+Sg+Ill: kalasân
     kales+N+Sg+Loc:  kalâsist
     kales+N+Sg+Com: kalâsijn
     kales+N+Sg+Abe: kallaasttáá
     kales+N+Ess:     kalesin
     kales+N+Par:    kalesid
     kales+N+Pl+Nom: kalaseh
     kales+N+Pl+Gen: kalasij
     kales+N+Pl+Acc: kalasijd
     kales+N+Pl+Ill: kalasáid
     kales+N+Pl+Loc: kalasâin
     kales+N+Pl+Com: kalasijguin
     kales+N+Pl+Abe: kalasijttáá


  Noun - skiillân: # 1B
    skiillân+N+Sg+Nom: skiillân
    skiillân+N+Sg+Gen: skiillân
    skiillân+N+Sg+Acc: skiillân
    skiillân+N+Sg+Ill: skilânân
    skiillân+N+Sg+Loc: skilânist
    skiillân+N+Sg+Com: skilânáin
    skiillân+N+Sg+Abe: skiillânttáá
    skiillân+N+Ess:    skilânin
    skiillân+N+Par:   skilânid
    skiillân+N+Pl+Nom: skilâneh
    skiillân+N+Pl+Gen: skilânij
    skiillân+N+Pl+Acc: skilânijd
    skiillân+N+Pl+Ill: skilânáid
    skiillân+N+Pl+Loc: skilânijn
    skiillân+N+Pl+Com: skilânijguin
    skiillân+N+Pl+Abe: skilânijttáá


  Noun - stielâs: # 2B
    stielâs+N+Sg+Nom: stielâs
    stielâs+N+Sg+Gen: stiellâs
    stielâs+N+Sg+Acc: stiellâs
    stielâs+N+Sg+Ill: stielâsân
    stielâs+N+Sg+Loc: stielâsist
    stielâs+N+Sg+Com: stielâsáin
    stielâs+N+Sg+Abe: stiellâsttáá
    stielâs+N+Ess:    stielâsin
    stielâs+N+Par:   stielâsid
    stielâs+N+Pl+Nom: stielâseh
    stielâs+N+Pl+Gen: stielâsij
    stielâs+N+Pl+Acc: stielâsijd
    stielâs+N+Pl+Ill: stielâsáid
    stielâs+N+Pl+Loc: stielâsijn
    stielâs+N+Pl+Com: stielâsijguin
    stielâs+N+Pl+Abe: stielâsijttáá
